Utah statutes.
48-1d-406.   Actions by partnership and partners.

(1)  A partnership may maintain an action against a partner for a breach of the partnership agreement, or for the violation of a duty to the partnership, causing harm to the partnership.

(2)  A partner may maintain an action against the partnership or another partner for legal or equitable relief, with or without an accounting as to the partnership's activities and affairs, to:

(a)  enforce the partner's rights under the partnership agreement;

(b)  enforce the partner's rights under this chapter; or

(c)  enforce the rights and otherwise protect the interests of the partner, including rights and interests arising independently of the partnership relationship.

(3)  The accrual of, and any time limitation on, a right of action for a remedy under this section is governed by other law.  A right to an accounting upon a dissolution and winding up does not revive a claim barred by law.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

